Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202545-702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act:

(1) Borrower means the mortgagor or mortgagors under a real estate mortgage or the trustor or trustors under a trust deed;

(2) Branch office means any location at which the business of a mortgage banker or mortgage loan originator is to be conducted, including (a) any offices physically located in Nebraska, (b) any offices that, while not physically located in this state, intend to transact business with Nebraska residents, and (c) any third-party or home-based locations that mortgage loan originators, agents, and representatives intend to use to transact business with Nebraska residents;

(3) Breach of security of the system means unauthorized acquisition of data that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the information maintained by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, its affiliates, or its subsidiaries;

(4) Clerical or support duties means tasks which occur subsequent to the receipt of a residential mortgage loan application including (a) the receipt, collection, distribution, and analysis of information common for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan or (b) communication with a consumer to obtain the information necessary for the processing or underwriting of a residential mortgage loan, to the extent that such communication does not include offering or negotiating loan rates or terms or counseling consumers about residential mortgage loan rates or terms;

(5) Control means the power, directly or indirectly, to direct the management or policies of a mortgage banking business, whether through ownership of securities, by contract, or otherwise. Any person who (a) is a director, a general partner, or an executive officer, including the president, chief executive officer, chief financial officer, chief operating officer, chief legal officer, chief compliance officer, and any individual with similar status and function, (b) directly or indirectly has the right to vote ten percent or more of a class of voting security or has the power to sell or direct the sale of ten percent or more of a class of voting securities, (c) in the case of a limited liability company, is a managing member, or (d) in the case of a partnership, has the right to receive, upon dissolution, or has contributed, ten percent or more of the capital, is presumed to control that mortgage banking business;

(6) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;

(7) Depository institution means any person (a) organized or chartered under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States relating to banks, savings institutions, trust companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, or industrial banks or similar depository institutions which the Board of Directors of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation finds to be operating substantially in the same manner as an industrial bank and (b) engaged in the business of receiving deposits other than funds held in a fiduciary capacity, including, but not limited to, funds held as trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or agent;

(8) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;

(9) Dwelling means a residential structure located or intended to be located in this state that contains one to four units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property, including an individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, mobile home, or trailer, if it is used as a residence;

(10) Federal banking agencies means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, the National Credit Union Administration, and the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

(11) Immediate family member means a spouse, child, sibling, parent, grandparent, or grandchild, including stepparents, stepchildren, stepsiblings, and adoptive relationships;

(12) Installment loan company means any person that has been issued an installment loan license pursuant to the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act;

(13) Licensee means any person licensed under the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act as either a mortgage banker or mortgage loan originator;

(14) Loan processor or underwriter means an individual who (a) performs clerical or support duties as an employee at the direction of and subject to the supervision and instruction of a person licensed, or exempt from licensing, under the Residential Mortgage Licensing Act or Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act and (b) does not represent to the public, through advertising or other means of communicating or providing information including the use of business cards, stationery, brochures, signs, rate lists, or other promotional items, that such individual can or will perform any of the activities of a mortgage loan originator;

(15) Mortgage banker or mortgage banking business means any person (a) other than (i) a person exempt under section 45-703, (ii) an individual who is a loan processor or underwriter, or (iii) an individual who is licensed in this state as a mortgage loan originator and (b) who, for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain, directly or indirectly makes, originates, services, negotiates, acquires, sells, arranges for, or offers to make, originate, service, negotiate, acquire, sell, or arrange for a residential mortgage loan;

(16)(a) Mortgage loan originator means an individual who for compensation or gain or in the expectation of compensation or gain (i) takes a residential mortgage loan application or (ii) offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan.

(b) Mortgage loan originator does not include (i) an individual engaged solely as a loan processor or underwriter except as otherwise provided in section 45-727, (ii) a person or entity that only performs real estate brokerage activities and is licensed or registered in accordance with Nebraska law, unless the person or entity is compensated by a lender, a mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator or by any agent of such lender, mortgage broker, or other mortgage loan originator, and (iii) a person solely involved in extensions of credit relating to time-share programs as defined in section 76-1702;

(17) Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry means a licensing system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage loan originators, mortgage bankers, installment loan companies, and other state-regulated financial services entities and industries;

(18) Nontraditional mortgage product means any residential mortgage loan product other than a thirty-year fixed rate residential mortgage loan;

(19) Offer means every attempt to provide, offer to provide, or solicitation to provide a residential mortgage loan or any form of mortgage banking business. Offer includes, but is not limited to, all general and public advertising, whether made in print, through electronic media, or by the Internet;

(20) Person means an association, joint venture, joint-stock company, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, business corporation, nonprofit corporation, individual, or any group of individuals however organized;

(21) Purchase-money mortgage means a mortgage issued to the borrower by the seller of the property as part of the purchase transaction;

(22) Real estate brokerage activity means any activity that involves offering or providing real estate brokerage services to the public, including (a) acting as a real estate salesperson or real estate broker for a buyer, seller, lessor, or lessee of real property, (b) bringing together parties interested in the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property, (c) negotiating, on behalf of any party, any portion of a contract relating to the sale, purchase, lease, rental, or exchange of real property, other than in connection with providing financing with respect to any such transaction, (d) engaging in any activity for which a person engaged in the activity is required to be registered or licensed as a real estate salesperson or real estate broker under any applicable law, and (e) offering to engage in any activity or act in any capacity described in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subdivision;

(23) Registered bank holding company means any bank holding company registered with the department pursuant to the Nebraska Bank Holding Company Act of 1995;

(24) Registered mortgage loan originator means any individual who (a) meets the definition of mortgage loan originator and is an employee of (i) a depository institution, (ii) a subsidiary that is (A) wholly owned and controlled by a depository institution and (B) regulated by a federal banking agency, or (iii) an institution regulated by the Farm Credit Administration and (b) is registered with, and maintains a unique identifier through, the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;

(25) Registrant means a person registered pursuant to section 45-704;

(26) Residential mortgage loan means any loan or extension of credit, including a refinancing of a contract of sale or an assumption or refinancing of a prior loan or extension of credit, which is primarily for personal, family, or household use and is secured by a mortgage, trust deed, or other equivalent consensual security interest on a dwelling or residential real estate upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling;

(27) Residential real estate means any real property located in this state upon which is constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling;

(28) Reverse-mortgage loan means a loan made by a licensee which (a) is secured by residential real estate, (b) is nonrecourse to the borrower except in the event of fraud by the borrower or waste to the residential real estate given as security for the loan, (c) provides cash advances to the borrower based upon the equity in the borrower's owner-occupied principal residence, (d) requires no payment of principal or interest until the entire loan becomes due and payable, and (e) otherwise complies with the terms of section 45-702.01;

(29) Service means accepting payments or maintenance of escrow accounts in the regular course of business in connection with a residential mortgage loan;

(30) State means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, any territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, or the Northern Mariana Islands; and

(31) Unique identifier means a number or other identifier assigned by protocols established by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 274;

Laws 1993, LB 217, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 163, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 17;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 30;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 29;

Laws 2003, LB 218, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 28;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 41;

Laws 2008, LB851, § 19;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB892, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB965, § 11;

Laws 2019, LB258, § 15;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 102.

Nebraska Bank Holding Company Act of 1995, see section 8-908.

Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, see section 45-334.